csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_i.yaml
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [gimiijinaabaniin,gimiijinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: gimiijinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [omiijinaawaabaniin,omiijinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: omiijinaawaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [omiijininaabaniin,omiijininaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: omiijininaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [omiijinaabaniin,omiijinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: omiijinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [nimiijiminaabaniin,nimiijiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg: nimiijiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [gimiijiminaabaniin,gimiijiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg: gimiijiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
